Washington statutes.
RCW 36.28.011

Duty to make complaint.

In addition to the duties contained in RCW 36.28.010, it shall be the duty of all sheriffs to make complaint of all violations of the criminal law, which shall come to their knowledge, within their respective jurisdictions.

[ 1963 c 4 s 36.28.011. Prior: 1955 c 10 s 1. Cf. Code 1881 s 2801, part; 1869 p 264 s 311, part; RRS s 4173, part.]